New York, session 2025-2026, A5976.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 2 1399-cc-1 to read as follows: 3 § 1399-cc-1. Sale of tobacco products and vapor products; 4 restrictions. 1. No tobacco product or vapor product shall be sold with- 5 in five hundred feet of any public or private school. 6 2. The measurements in subdivision one of this section are to be taken 7 in straight lines from the nearest point of the property line of the 8 parcel on which the school is located to the nearest point of the prop- 9 erty line of the parcel on which the business is located. 10 3. Violations of this section shall be enforced pursuant to section 11 thirteen hundred ninety-nine-ff of this article, except that any person 12 may submit a complaint to an enforcement officer reporting that a 13 violation of this section has occurred. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 15 it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05163-01-5